pt-BR: Ponderação de frequência: Ponderação A; Ponderação C; Ponderação Z; Outro
el: Στάθμιση συχνότητας: Στάθμιση Α; Στάθμιση C; Στάθμιση Ζ; Άλλο
zh-CN: 频率计权: A 计权; C 计权; Z 计权; 其他
it: Ponderazione in frequenza: Pesatura A; Pesatura C; Pesatura Z; Altro
en: Frequency weighting: A-weighting; C-weighting; Z-weighting; Other
hr-HR: Ponderiranje frekvencije: A-ponderiranje; C-ponderiranje; Z-ponderiranje; Ostalo
sl-SI: Frekvenčno uteženje: A-ponderiranje; C-ponderiranje; Z-ponderiranje; Drugo
bg-BG: Честотно претегляне: А-претегляне; C-претегляне; Z-претегляне; Други
da: Frekvensvægtning: A-vægtning; C-vægtning; Z-vægtning; Andet
ru: Частотная коррекция: A-взвешивание; C-взвешивание; Z-взвешивание; Другой
sv: Frekvensvägning: A-vägning; C-vägning; Z-vägning; Övrigt
nl: Frequentieweging: A-weging; C-weging; Z-weging; Andere
pl: Ważenie częstotliwości: Ważenie A; Ważenie C; Ważenie Z; Inne
tr: Frekans Ağırlıklandırma: A ağırlık; C ağırlık; Z ağırlık; Diğer
vi: Tần trọng số: Trọng số A; Trọng số C; Trọng số Z; Khác
ko: 주파수 가중: A 가중치; C 가중치; Z 가중치; 기타
pt-PT: Pesos de frequência: Ponderação A; Ponderação C; Ponderação Z; Outro
sk-SK: Frekvenčné váženie: A-váženie; C-váženie; Z-váženie; Iné
zh-TW: 頻率加權: A加權; C加權; Z加權; 其他
fi: Taajuuspainotus: A-painotus; C-painotus; Z-painotus; Muu
th: การถ่วงน้ำหนักความถี่: การเวจท์เสียง A; การเวจท์เสียง C; การเวจท์เสียง Z; อื่นๆ
hu: Frekvenciasúlyozás: „A” súlyozás; „C” súlyozás; „Z” súlyozás; Egyéb
es: Ponderación de frecuencia: Ponderación A; Ponderación C; Ponderación Z; Otros
cs: Frekvenční vážení: Hodnocení A; Hodnocení C; Hodnocení Z; Jiné
de: Frequenzgewichtung: A-Frequenzgewichtung; C-Frequenzgewichtung; Z-Frequenzgewichtung; Sonstiges
nb: Frekvensvekting: A-vekting; C-vekting; Z-vekting; Annet
lt-LT: Dažnio svertiniai koeficientai: A svertinis; C svertinis; Z svertinis; Kita
fr: Pondération fréquentielle: Décibel A; Décibel C; Décibel Z; Autre
ja: 周波数重み付け: Aウェイト; Cウェイト; Zウェイト; その他
ro-RO: Ponderare în frecvență: Ponderare în A; Ponderarea în C; Ponderarea în Z; Altele